Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-206 Security interest arising in
purchase or delivery of financial asset. (a) A security interest in favor
of a securities intermediary attaches to a person's security entitlement if:

(1) The person buys a financial asset through the
securities intermediary in a transaction in which the person is obligated to
pay the purchase price to the securities intermediary at the time of the
purchase; and

(2) The securities intermediary credits the financial
asset to the buyer's securities account before the buyer pays the securities
intermediary.

(b) The security interest described in
subsection (a) secures the person's obligation to pay for the financial asset.

(c) A security interest in favor of a person
that delivers a certificated security or other financial asset represented by a
writing attaches to the security or other financial asset if:

(1) The security or other financial asset:

(A) In the ordinary course of business is
transferred by delivery with any necessary indorsement or assignment; and

(B) Is delivered under an agreement between
persons in the business of dealing with such securities or financial assets;
and

(2) The agreement calls for delivery against payment.

(d) The security interest described in
subsection (c) secures the obligation to make payment for the delivery. [L
2000, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next